fst/morphology/phonology/phonology.xfscript
!! Definitions

define Bx [ %> | %< ] ;
  
define Ix [ i | í | i2 | i3 | í2 | í3 ] ;
  
! define Vowel [ a | aa | á | áa | i | ii | í | íi | o | oo | ó | óo | ai | áí | ao | áó | oi | óí | i2 | í2 | i3 | í3 ] ;

define Vshort [ a | á | i | í | o | ó | i2 | í2 | i3 | í3 | a3 | a4 | o2 | á3 | á4 | ó2 ] ;

define Vlong [ [a a] | [á a] | [i i] | [í i] | [o o] | [ó o] | [ó ó] | [a i] | [á í] | [a o] | [á ó] | [o i] | [ó í] | [ á á ] | [ o a ] ] ; ! added oa as a long vowel to account for im > m in aakiikoan > nitaakiikoama, assumed for isttoana

define Vowel [ Vshort | Vlong ] ;

define Vacc [ á | [á a] | í | [í i] | ó | [ó o] | [á í] | [á ó] | [ó í] | [ á á ] | [ó ó] ];

define Cshort [ k | m | n | p | s | t | w | y | y2 | ' | h | n2 | m2 | s2 ] ;

#define Cx [ ts | ks | h | k | m | n | p | s | t | w | y | pp | tt | kk | ss | mm | nn ] ;

define Clong [ [p p] | [t t] | [k k] | [s s] | [m m] | [n n] | [k s] | [t s] ] ;

define Consonant [ Cshort | Clong ] ;
  
define Gx [ w | y | y2 ] ;

!! Rules

! removing accent marks
define rmAccent [ á -> a , í -> i , ó -> o ] ;

! The following code is for the highest level of morpho-phonological initial allomorphy 

!yamoohk > iamoohk after maat > maatsamoohk; created y2 just for this; not enough evidence to know if this is i2 (e.g. would also break k) ; palatalization and i absorption should take care of rest

define y2iRule [ y2 -> i || t %< _ ] ;
define y22yRule [ y2 -> y ] ;

!define shortPrefix [ n i t -> n , k i t -> k , o t -> w || .#. _ %< %^SP [ Vowel | m ] ,, n i t -> n i , k i t -> k i , o t -> o || .#. _ %< %^SP [ k | n | p | s | t | n2 | h ] ] ;
define shortPrefix [ n i t -> n , k i t -> k || .#. _ %< %^SP ,, o t -> m || .#. _ %< %^SP a ,, o t -> w || .#. _ %< %^SP [ Consonant | Ix | o ] ] ;
!define internasal [ a -> o || %< %^SP m _ [ m | n ] ] ; ! is it m | n ?

!!€ nit<^SPitan>wa
!!€ nitana

!!€ ot<^SPaahk<wahkayi>hsi
!!€ maahkahkayssi

!!€ kit<omitaa>im>wa
!!€ kitomitaama

!We can probably get rid of most of these now with the initial/noninitial stem sets
!define mattException [ n -> n i , k -> k i , w -> o || .#. _ %< m [ a | á ] t t ] ;
!define mdeletion [ m -> 0 || .#. [ n | k | w ] %< %^SP _ ] ; ! removing for naaahs, I think other issues will be solved with stem sets
!define iInsertion [ n -> n i , k -> k i , w -> o || _ %< %^SP [ k | n | p | s | t | n2 ] ] ;
define rmSP [ %^SP -> 0 ] ;
!define a2iRule [ a4 -> i2 || %< _ ] ;
!define ohPrefix [ 0 -> o || %< _ h ] ;
!define hdeletion [ h -> 0 || .#. _ ] ;

!define strongt [ [ m | n ] -> 0 || t %< _ ] ;
!define weakt [ t -> 0 || _ %< [ p | k ] ] ;
!define strongk [ p -> 0 || [ k | p ] %< _ ] ;
!define strongp [ k -> 0 || [ k | p ] %< _ ] ;
define weakm [ m -> 0 || Consonant %< _ ] ; ! repurposing rule for matt, which surfaces as att after consonants in examples; currently only prestem/stem to start with m in elsewhere list, may apply to others as lists expand (also mattsista')

!define oAlternation [ i2 (->) [ o | a ] || .#. _ [ o | a ] ] ;
!define ghosti2 [ "i2" -> 0 || .#. _ Consonant ] ;
!define i2oRule [ i3 -> o , i3 y -> o2 , a3 -> o || %< _ ] ;
!define w2yRule [ w (->) y || _ %< Vowel ] ; ! we think this is the w~y prestem variation, now dealt with using wyVarRule
!define iDissimilation [ i -> o || _ y %< i ] ;
!define intervocalicN [ n -> y || Vowel %< _ Vowel ] ;

define rcprRule [ o -> 0 || t %> %^RCPR _ ,, o -> o o || Ix %> %^RCPR _ ] ; ! also behaves like a VTA suffix VLV p. 117)
define rmRcpr [ %^RCPR -> 0 ] ;
define bnfRule [ o -> 0 || V %> %^BNF _ ] ;
define rmBnf [ %^BNF -> 0 ] ;

!!€ nit<ikakomimm>^RCPRotsiiyi>hpinnaan
!!€ nitsikakomimmotsiiyihpinnaan

!!€ nit<inakat>^RCPRotsiiyi>hpinnaan
!!€ nitsinakattsiiyihpinnaan

!!€ nit<ipohkisstoyi>^RCPRotsiiyi>hpinnaana
!!€ nitsipohkisstoyootsiiyihpinnaana

! Demonstrative trigger rules (-wa > 0 | o-_)

define Demwa20Rule [ w a -> 0 || o %> %^DEM _ ] ;
define DemPli20Rule [ i (->) 0 || o %> %^DEM _ ] ;
define Demtrigger20 [ %^DEM -> 0 ] ;

!!€ anno>^DEMwa
!!€ anno

!!€ anno>^DEMiksi
!!€ annoiksi, annoksi

! Inverse o rules
define Invo20Rule [ o -> 0 || t %>  %^INV_ ] ;
define Invo2ooRule [ o -> o o || Ix %> %^INV _ ] ;
define Invtrigger20 [ %^INV -> 0 ] ;

!!€ nit<inakat>^INVokssi
!!€ nitsinakakkssi

!!€ kit<ipohkisstoyi>^INVoka
!!€ kitsipohkisstoyooka

! 3MM VAIs

define 3MMsuffixRule [ m m -> 0 || _ %^3MM [ .#. | %> [ Vowel | [ Consonant - [Gx] ] ] ] ] ;
define 3MMtrigger20 [ %^3MM -> 0 ] ;

!!€ nit<aak<oht<wahkayimm^3MM
!!€ nitaakohtahkayi

!!€ ayaak<wahkayimm^3MM>yi>aawa
!!€ ayaakahkayimmiaawa


!VLVs in VTA suffix rules
define VLVsuffixRule [ o -> o o || Ix %> %^VLV _ ,, a -> a a || Ix %> %^VLV _ ] ;
define VLVtrigger20 [ %^VLV -> 0 ] ;

!!€ kit<ipohkisstoyi>^VLVawa
!!€ kitsipohkisstoyaawa

!!€ nit<inakat>^VLVawa
!!€ nitsinakatawa

!VTA 3O imperative suffixes lengthen preceding vowels (p.126)

define IMPsuffixRule1 [ [ i | o ] -> 0 || Vowel %> %^IMP _ ] ;
define IMPsuffixRule2 [ i -> i i || Consonant _ %> %^IMP ,, a -> a a || Consonant _ %> %^IMP ,, a -> a a || Consonant _ %> %^IMP ] ;
define IMPsuffixRule [ IMPsuffixRule1 .o. IMPsuffixRule2 ] ;

!!€ ^IMPpoohkisstoyi>^IMPok
!!€ poohkisstoyiik

!!€ ^IMPinakat>^IMPok
!!€ inakatok

! for certain stems that begin with it, this becomes (i)st initially
define IMPit2istRule [ i t -> (i) s t || %^IMP %^IMP _ ] ; 

!!€ ^IMP^IMPitapoo^DIPH>t
!!€ istapoot, stapoot

!!€ ^IMPa'po'taki>k
!!€ a'potakik

define IMPtrigger20 [ %^IMP -> 0 ] ;

!PRO suffix rules (p. 52)

define a20ProRule [ a -> 0 || _ %> %^PRO a ] ;
define i20ProRule [ i -> 0 || [ m | n ] _ %> %^PRO a ] ;
define PROtrigger20 [ %^PRO -> 0 ] ;

!!€ aak<wahkayi>wa>^PROáyi
!!€ aakahkayiwayi

! IC past, imperative (sV, ICV > sayV, CayV)
define ICpastRule [ s (->) %^IC s a y || %^IC %< %^IC _ Vowel ,, 
i2 s (->) %^IC s a y || %^IC %< %^IC _ Vowel ,, 
i2 p (->) %^IC p a y || %^IC %< %^IC _ Vowel ,, 
i2 t (->) %^IC t a y || %^IC %< %^IC _ Vowel ,, 
i2 k (s) (->) %^IC k a y || %^IC %< %^IC _ Vowel ] ;
define ICpastii20 [ i i -> 0 || _ %^IC %< %^IC %^IC ] ;

define ICimpRule [ s -> s a y || %^IMP %^IC _ Vowel ,, 
i2 s -> s a y || %^IMP %^IC _ Vowel ,, 
p -> p a y || %^IMP %^IC _ Vowel ,, 
i2 p -> p a y || %^IMP %^IC _ Vowel ,, 
t -> t a y || %^IMP %^IC _ Vowel ,, 
i2 t -> t a y || %^IMP %^IC _ Vowel ,, 
k (s) -> k a y || %^IMP %^IC _ Vowel ,,
i2 k (s) -> k a y || %^IMP %^IC _ Vowel ] ;
define ICtrigger20 [ %^IC -> 0 ] ;

!! Drawn from Frantz, D. G. (1991). Blackfoot Grammar, 2nd Edition. University of Toronto Press. Appendix B.

!! 1. Gemination C1 > C2 / _ + C2
#check glottal stop

define Ck2kkRule [ Cshort -> k || _ %> k ] ;

!define Cp2ppRule [ Cshort -> p || _ %> p ] ;

!define Ct2ttRule [ Cshort -> t || _ %> t ] ;

!define Cs2ssRule [ Cshort -> s || _ %> s ] ;

!define Cm2mmRule [ Cshort -> m || _ %> m ] ;

!define Cn2nnRule [ Cshort -> n || _ %> n ] ;

!define CC2GemRule [ Ck2kkRule .o. Cp2ppRule .o. Ct2ttRule .o. Cs2ssRule .o. Cm2mmRule .o. Cn2nnRule ] ;

! The following is the morpho-phonology of the inflectional suffix boundary

!define mmRule [ a -> 0 || Clong %> _ a ] ;

!p. 79, im has some variability. perhaps need to create general rules, and mark specific stems with triggers?

define imRule1 [ i -> 0 || [ Vlong ] %> _ m %> ] ; ! can't see why i should be in this context, removing for now
define imRule2 [ a -> 0 || _ %^AIM %> i m ] ; ! e.g. ninaa > nitsinaima
define imRule [ imRule1 .o. imRule2 ] ;
define AIMtrigger20 [ %^AIM -> 0 ] ;

!define finalNrule [ i -> 0 || n %> _ n ,, i -> 0 || _ %> i n ] ; ! this is applying twice in aakii yaml - why would this be in the rule list twice? ordering change accident? this might be doubling with the innaan/innoon rule, removing for now
!define finalNdiss [ n -> 0 || k [ i | í ] _ %> [ i k s i | i s t s i ] ,, n -> 0 || o [ á | a ]  _ %> [ i k s i | i s t s i ] ] ; ! managing this now with nonpermC rule

! non-permanent stem-final n, m, s -- now n2, m2, s2 Frantz p. 12, 13, 87-88 (any suffix beginning in a vowel - plural, non-particular, innaan, innoon, need to find out about im)
define nonpermCRule [ [ n2 | s2 | m2 | m2 m2 ] -> 0 || _ %> (%^POSS) Vowel ] ;

! innaan, innoon i lost after i, a, w, y, after non-permanent consonant is deleted (p. 81, awahsin example in dictionary) looks like this also shouldn't lengthen i after s2 --- miistsis, moksis yaml change

define pluralPossSuffixRule [ i -> 0 || [ i | a | w | y ] %> %^POSS _ [ n n a a n | n n o o n ] ] ;

define POSStrigger20 [ %^POSS -> 0 ] ;

! rule to make at least aaapan and naapiikoan work; after breaking and palatalisation (also naam ~ i2am - aa ~ a VLV?) 

define iaa2aaRule [ [ i | i2 ] -> 0 || _ [ a a ] ] ;
define i2deletion [ i2 -> 0 || _ o ] ; 



!define fixN [ n+ -> 0 || _ (Bx) n n ] ;
! define n20Rule [ n -> 0 || Vshort _ %> Vowel ,, o [ a | á ] _ %> Vowel ] ;
! define sisRule [ s -> 0 || s [ i | í ] _ Bx i Consonant ] ;
define oaawaRule [ w a -> 0 || Vlong w a (Bx) _ ] ;
define pastPrefix [ Vowel (o) -> 0 || [ .#. | %< ] i i %< _ ] ;
define pastPrefixSik [ Vowel -> 0 || [ .#. | %< ] n a %< _ ] ;
! define Dipthongization [ 0 (->) [ a ] || _ [ o o | ó ó ] %> [ o ' p a | h s i | o ' k i | o ' t o p i ] ] ; ! removed accent for inserted a; changing to work with trigger

define Dipthongization [ o o -> a o || _ %^DIPH %> [ o ' p (a) | h s i | o ' k i | o ' t o p i ] ,, i ( i ) -> a o || _ %^DIPH %> [ o ' p (a) | h s i | o ' k i | o ' t o p i ] ,, i -> a o || Consonant _ %^DIPH %> [ o ' p (a) | h s i | o ' k i | o ' t o p i ] ] ; ! identify these by searching ~ in dictionary backend

!can also use the DIPH trigger for the oo(w/y) variation (behaves like wyVarRule1 but with suffixes)

define wyVarRule1 [ G -> y || _ %< [ i | i2 ] ,, G -> w || _ %< [ a | o ] ] ; ! replaces w2y with special character for underspecified glide
define wyVarRule2 [ 0 -> y || o o _ %^DIPH %> [ i | i2 ] ] ; ! just for oo 'go' final
define wyVarRule [ wyVarRule1 .o. wyVarRule2 ] ;

define DIPHtrigger20 [ %^DIPH -> 0 ] ;

! define moveDur [ á %< a ' p -> %< a ' p á ,, á %< á ' p -> %< a ' p á ] ; ! accents causing problems that's why it no longer works
define moveDur [ a %< a ' p -> %< a ' p a ] ; ! removed accents
!define delNi [ n i (i) -> 0 || n i (i) %< _ ] ;
!define initVV2V [ [ a a | á á ] (->) a || %< _ ] ; ! remove for now, seems to be a stem-specific thing

!!€ nitáni2t>k>wa
!!€ nitánikka 

! 2. s-Insertion 0 > s / I _ t 

define sInsRule2 [ i2 t -> i2 s t ] ;
!define sInsRule [ [..] -> s || t _ i | i2 | í ] ; t affrication
!define BreakSRule [ [..] -> s || k _ i2 ] ; ! done elsewhere

!!€ nitáni2t>awa
!!€ nitánistawa 

! x-Sibilation h > ss / i2 _

define h2ssRule [ h s -> s s || i2 _ ] ;

!!€ ann>yi2hka
!!€ annisska

! 4a. s-Connection A 0 > s / C+_s

!define sConnRuleA [ Consonant Bx s -> Consonant Bx s s ,, Consonant Bx s s -> Consonant Bx s s s ] ;
define sConnRuleA [ s -> s s  || Consonant Bx _ ,, s -> s s  || Consonant Bx _ s ] ;

!!€ nit<siksipawa
!!€ nitssiksipawa

! 4b. s-Connection B 0 > s / V(')+_s

!define sConnRuleB [ Vowel (') %< s -> Vowel (') %< i s ] ;
define sConnRuleB [ s -> i s || Vowel (') %< _ ] ; 

!!€ á<sínaakiwa
!!€ áísínaakiwa

!!€ káta'<simiwa
!!€ kátai'simiwa

! 5. o-Replacement o > a / _+a

define oReplaceRule [ o -> a || _ %< a ] ;

!!€ áakoto<apinniiwa
!!€ áakotaapinniiwa

! 6. Coalescence wi(:) > o

define wi2oRuleA1 [ w %< [i i] -> o %< ] ;
define wi2oRuleA2 [ w %< [ i | i2 ] -> o %< ] ;

!!€ w<iihsíssi
!!€ ohsíssi

define wi2oRuleB1 [ w %< [í i] -> ó %< ] ;
define wi2oRuleB2 [ w %< [ í | í2 ] -> ó %< ] ;

!!€ w<ínni
!!€ ónni

! '. Breaking k > ks / _i2

define k2ksRule [ k -> k s || [ Vowel | Consonant ] _ (Bx) [ i2 | o2 ] ] ;


!!€ áak<i2piima
!!€ áaksipiima

! 9. Desyllabification i > y, o > w / V + _ V ! ordering before 10 for kitaakiiwaawa, after 12 for o'tsoaawa

define i2yRule [ [ i | i2 ] -> y || Vowel Bx _ [ o | a ] ] ;
define o2wRule [ o -> w || Vowel Bx _ [ i | a ] ] ;
define Vowel2GlideRule [ i2yRule .o. o2wRule ] ;

!!€ á<i2o'kaa>wa
!!€ áyo'kaawa
